Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1064.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 823. Firearms policy.(a) Establishment.--A health care facility shall establish and make publicly accessible a policy regarding the prohibition or acceptance of the possession of firearms or firearm accessories, including ammunition, within or on the premises of the health care facility. If firearms are permitted within or on 123456789101112131415161718192021 the premises, the policy shall provide for the safe carrying and storing of firearms at the health care facility. If firearms are not permitted within or on the premises, the policy shall provide for the procedures for employees to follow if an individual enters the premises possessing a firearm.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care facility." The following:(1) A health care facility as defined under section 103.(2) A facility as defined in section 103.1 of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the "Mental Health Procedures Act."(3) An urgent care center as defined in section 2 of the act of November 2, 2016 (P.L.976, No.122), known as the "Safe Emergency Prescribing Act."(4) A dental office or treatment facility.(5) Any other facility where medical services are rendered."Medical services." As defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1064PN1165 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122